North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-20 Chemical Test for Intoxication, Implied Consent

39-20-01.
Implied consent to determine alcohol concentration and presence of drugs.

Any individual who operates a motor vehicle on a highway or on public or private areas to which the public has a right of access for vehicular use in this state is deemed to have given consent, and shall consent, subject to the provisions of this chapter, to a chemical test, or tests, of the blood, breath, oral fluid, or urine for the purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or presence of other drugs, or combination thereof, in the individual’s blood, breath, oral fluid, or urine. As used in this chapter, the word “drug” means any drug or substance or combination of drugs or substances which renders an individual incapable of safely driving, and the words “chemical test” or “chemical analysis” mean any test to determine the alcohol concentration or presence of other drugs, or combination thereof, in the individual’s blood, breath, or urine, approved by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee under this chapter.

The test or tests must be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer only after placing the individual under arrest for violation of section 39-08-01 or an equivalent offense. For the purposes of this chapter, the taking into custody of a child under section 27-20.4-05 or an individual under twenty-one years of age satisfies the requirement of an arrest. The law enforcement officer shall determine which of the tests is to be used.

The law enforcement officer shall inform the individual North Dakota law requires the individual to take a chemical test to determine whether the individual is under the influence of alcohol or drugs and refusal of the individual to submit to a test directed by the law enforcement officer may result in a revocation of the individual’s driving privileges for a minimum of one hundred eighty days and up to three years.

If an individual refuses to submit to testing under this section, proof of the refusal is not admissible in any administrative proceeding under this chapter if the law enforcement officer fails to inform the individual as required under subdivision a.

When an individual under the age of eighteen years is taken into custody for violating section 39-08-01 or an equivalent ordinance, the law enforcement officer shall attempt to contact the individual’s parent or legal guardian to explain the cause for the custody. Neither the law enforcement officer’s efforts to contact, nor any consultation with, a parent or legal guardian may be permitted to interfere with the administration of chemical testing requirements under this chapter. The law enforcement officer shall mail a notice to the parent or legal guardian of the minor within ten days after the test results are received or within ten days after the minor is taken into custody if the minor refuses to submit to testing. The notice must contain a statement of the test performed and the results of that test; or if the minor refuses to submit to the testing, a statement notifying of that fact. The attempt to contact or the contacting or notification of a parent or legal guardian is not a precondition to the admissibility of chemical test results or the finding of a consent to, or refusal of, chemical testing by the individual in custody.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 1; 1961, ch. 269, § 1; 1983, ch. 415, § 24; 1983, ch. 444, § 1; 1985, ch. 429, § 11; 1987, ch. 460, § 9; 1989, ch. 478, § 1; 1995, ch. 299, § 2; 1997, ch. 334, § 2; 2005, ch. 195, § 16; 2005, ch. 330, § 5; 2011, ch. 288, § 13; 2013, ch. 301, § 11; 2015, ch. 268, § 9, effective April 15, 2015; 2017, ch. 108, § 15, effective April 21, 2017; 2017, ch. 268, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 322, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 24, effective May 3, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 34, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015 became effective April 15, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 15 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015.

Note.

Section 39-20-01 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 24 of Chapter 172, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1213; and Section 34 of Chapter 245, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1035.

Section 39-20-01 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 15 of Chapter 108, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1041; and Section 4 of Chapter 268, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2176.

Section 39-20-01 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 15 of Chapter 108, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1041; and Section 4 of Chapter 268, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2176.

Cross-References.

Arrest without warrant, see § 29-06-15.

Persons under the influence of intoxicating liquor or controlled substances not to operate vehicle, see § 39-08-01.

39-20-01.1.
Chemical test of driver in serious bodily injury or fatal crashes.

If the driver of a vehicle is involved in a crash resulting in the death of another individual, and there is probable cause to believe that the driver is in violation of section 39-08-01, a law enforcement officer shall request the driver to submit to a chemical test or tests of the driver’s blood, breath, or urine to determine the alcohol concentration or the presence of other drugs or substances, or both.

If the driver of a vehicle is involved in a crash resulting in the serious bodily injury, as defined in section 12.1-01-04, of another individual, and there is probable cause to believe that the driver is in violation of section 39-08-01, a law enforcement officer shall request the driver to submit to a test or tests of the driver’s blood, breath, or urine to determine the alcohol concentration or the presence of other drugs or substances, or both.

If the driver refuses to submit to a chemical test or tests of the driver’s blood, breath, or urine and exigent circumstances are not present, the law enforcement officer shall request a search warrant to compel the driver to submit to a chemical test or tests of the driver’s blood, breath, or urine to determine the alcohol concentration or the presence of other drugs or substances, or both.

The approved methods of the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee must be followed in collecting and preserving a sample of the driver’s blood, breath, or urine and conducting a chemical test or tests to determine the alcohol concentration or the presence of other drugs or substances, or both.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 460, § 10; 2009, ch. 339, § 1; 2013, ch. 301, § 12.

39-20-02.
Individuals qualified to administer test and opportunity for additional test.

Only an individual medically qualified to draw blood, acting at the request of a law enforcement officer, may withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or presence of other drugs, or combination thereof, in the individual’s blood. The director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee shall determine the qualifications or credentials for being medically qualified to draw blood, and shall issue a list of approved designations including medical doctor and registered nurse. This limitation does not apply to the taking of a breath or urine specimen. The director of the state crime laboratory, or the director’s designee, shall electronically post a copy of the certified list of approved designations, including medical doctor and registered nurse, with the state crime laboratory division of the attorney general at the attorney general website and shall make the certified records required by this section available for download in a printable format on the attorney general website. The individual tested may have an individual of the individual’s choosing, who is medically qualified to draw blood, administer a chemical test or tests in addition to any administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer with all costs of an additional test or tests to be the sole responsibility of the individual charged. The failure or inability to obtain an additional test by an individual does not preclude the admission of the test or tests taken at the direction of a law enforcement officer. Upon the request of the individual who is tested, a copy of the operational checklist and test record of a breath sample test or analytical report of a blood or urine sample test taken at the direction of the law enforcement officer must be made available to that individual by the law enforcement agency that administered the test or tests.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 2; 1983, ch. 415, § 25; 1983, ch. 444, § 2; 1985, ch. 429, § 12; 1999, ch. 358, § 7; 2005, ch. 195, § 17; 2011, ch. 288, § 14.

39-20-03.
Consent of person incapable of refusal not withdrawn. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 3; 1961, ch. 269, § 2; 1969, ch. 356, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 268, § 9, effective August 1, 2017.

39-20-03.1.
Action following test result for a resident operator.

If a person submits to a test under section 39-20-01 or 39-20-02 and the test shows that person to have an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to a person under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight at the time of the performance of a chemical test within two hours after the driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle, the following procedures apply:

The law enforcement officer shall immediately issue to that person a temporary operator’s permit if the person then has valid operating privileges, extending driving privileges for the next twenty-five days, or until earlier terminated by the decision of a hearing officer under section 39-20-05. The law enforcement officer shall sign and note the date on the temporary operator’s permit. The temporary operator’s permit serves as the director’s official notification to the person of the director’s intent to revoke, suspend, or deny driving privileges in this state.

If a test administered under section 39-20-01 was by urine sample or by drawing blood as provided in section 39-20-02 and the individual tested is not a resident of an area in which the law enforcement officer has jurisdiction, the law enforcement officer shall, on receiving the analysis of the urine or blood from the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee and if the analysis shows that individual had an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to an individual under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight, either proceed in accordance with subsection 1 during that individual’s reappearance within the officer’s jurisdiction, proceed in accordance with subsection 3, or notify a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where the individual lives. On that notification, that law enforcement agency shall, within twenty-four hours, forward a copy of the temporary operator’s permit to the law enforcement agency making the arrest or to the director. The law enforcement agency shall issue to that individual a temporary operator’s permit as provided in this section, and shall sign and date the permit as provided in subsection 1.

If the test results indicate an alcohol concentration at or above the legal limit, the law enforcement agency making the arrest may mail a temporary operator’s permit to the individual who submitted to the blood or urine test, whether or not the individual is a resident of the area in which the law enforcement officer has jurisdiction. The third day after the mailing of the temporary operator’s permit is considered the date of issuance. Actual notice of the opportunity for a hearing under this section is deemed to have occurred seventy-two hours after the notice is mailed by regular mail to the address submitted by the individual to the law enforcement officer. The temporary operator’s permit serves as the director’s official notification to the individual of the director’s intent to revoke, suspend, or deny driving privileges in this state.

The law enforcement officer, within five days of the issuance of the temporary operator’s permit, shall forward to the director a certified written report in the form required by the director. If the individual was issued a temporary operator’s permit because of the results of a test, the report must show that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the individual had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while in violation of section 39-08-01, or equivalent ordinance, that the individual was lawfully arrested, that the individual was tested for alcohol concentration under this chapter, and that the results of the test show that the individual had an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to an individual under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight. In addition to the operator’s license and report, the law enforcement officer shall forward to the director a certified copy of the operational checklist and test records of a breath test and a copy of the certified copy of the analytical report for a blood or urine test for all tests administered at the direction of the officer.

An individual charged with a violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance may elect to participate in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12 in lieu of the administrative hearing under this chapter if the individual’s driver’s license is not subject to an unrelated suspension or revocation. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual may not receive a temporary restricted operator’s license until after fourteen days after the administrative hearing on the offense under this chapter has been waived or held, or after fourteen days of the final appeal, whichever is longer. The director shall issue a temporary restricted driver’s license with the restriction the individual participate in the twenty-four seven sobriety program upon application by the individual with submission of proof of financial responsibility and proof of participation in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 415, § 33; 1985, ch. 429, § 13; 1987, ch. 460, § 11; 1987, ch. 481, § 1; 1989, ch. 478, § 2; 1993, ch. 387, § 2; 1997, ch. 334, § 3; 2003, ch. 316, § 3; 2005, ch. 195, § 18; 2007, ch. 338, § 1; 2009, ch. 328, § 5; 2009, ch. 340, § 1; 2011, ch. 288, § 15; 2013, ch. 301, § 13; 2017, ch. 268, § 5, effective August 1, 2017.

39-20-03.2.
Action following test result or on refusing test by nonresident operator.

If a person licensed in another state refuses in this state to submit to a test provided under section 39-20-01 or 39-20-14, or who submits to a test under section 39-20-01 or 39-20-02 and the test results show the person to have an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to a person under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight at the time of performance of a test within two hours after driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle, the following procedures apply:

Without taking possession of the person’s out-of-state operator’s license, the law enforcement officer shall issue to the person a notification of the test results and a temporary operator’s permit extending nonresident operating privileges in this state for twenty-five days from the date of issuance or until earlier terminated by the decision of a hearing officer under section 39-20-05. The temporary permit must be signed and dated by the officer and serves as the director’s official notification to the person of the director’s intent to revoke, suspend, or deny driving privileges in this state, and of the hearing procedures under this chapter.

If the test was administered by urine sample or by drawing blood, the law enforcement officer, on reviewing the alcohol concentration analysis showing the individual had an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to an individual under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight, shall mail or issue to the individual a notification of the test results, a temporary operator’s permit extending nonresident operating privileges in this state for twenty-five days from the date of mailing or issuance or until earlier terminated by the decision of a hearing officer under section 39-20-05, and notice of the intent to revoke, suspend, or deny driving privileges in this state, together with the notice provided under section 39-06.1-07 of the procedures available under this chapter. The temporary operator’s permit must be signed and dated by the officer. The third day after the mailing of the temporary operator’s permit is considered the date of issuance.

The law enforcement officer, within five days of issuing the temporary operator’s permit, shall forward to the director a certified written report in the form required by the director and a certified copy of the operational checklist and test records of a breath test and a copy of the certified copy of the analytical report for a blood or urine test for all tests administered at the direction of the officer. If the individual was issued a temporary operator’s permit because of the individual’s refusal to submit to a test under sections 39-20-01 and 39-20-14, the report must include information as provided in section 39-20-04. If the individual was issued a temporary operator’s permit because of the results of a test, the report must show that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the individual had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while in violation of section 39-08-01, or equivalent ordinance, that the individual was lawfully arrested, that the individual was tested for alcohol concentration under this chapter, and that the results of the test show that the individual had an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to an individual under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 415, § 34; 1985, ch. 429, § 14; 1987, ch. 460, § 12; 1987, ch. 481, § 2; 1993, ch. 387, § 3; 1997, ch. 334, § 4; 2001, ch. 340, § 9; 2003, ch. 316, § 4; 2009, ch. 328, § 6; 2011, ch. 288, § 16; 2017, ch. 268, § 6, effective August 1, 2017.

39-20-04.
Revocation of privilege to drive motor vehicle upon refusal to submit to testing.

If a person refuses to submit to testing under section 39-20-01 or 39-20-14, none may be given, but the law enforcement officer shall immediately take possession of the person’s operator’s license if it is then available and shall immediately issue to that person a temporary operator’s permit, if the person then has valid operating privileges, extending driving privileges for the next twenty-five days or until earlier terminated by a decision of a hearing officer under section 39-20-05. The law enforcement officer shall sign and note the date on the temporary operator’s permit. The temporary operator’s permit serves as the director’s official notification to the person of the director’s intent to revoke driving privileges in this state and of the hearing procedures under this chapter. The director, upon the receipt of that person’s operator’s license and a certified written report of the law enforcement officer in the form required by the director, forwarded by the officer within five days after issuing the temporary operator’s permit, showing that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while in violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance or, for purposes of section 39-20-14, had reason to believe that the person committed a moving traffic violation or was involved in a traffic accident as a driver, and in conjunction with the violation or accident the officer has, through the officer’s observations, formulated an opinion that the person’s body contains alcohol, that the person was lawfully arrested if applicable, and that the person had refused to submit to the test or tests under section 39-20-01 or 39-20-14, shall revoke that person’s license or permit to drive and any nonresident operating privilege for the appropriate period under this section, or if the person is a resident without a license or a permit to operate a motor vehicle in this state, the director shall deny to the person the issuance of a license or permit for the appropriate period under this section after the date of the alleged violation, subject to the opportunity for a prerevocation hearing and postrevocation review as provided in this chapter. In the revocation of the person’s operator’s license the director shall give credit for time in which the person was without an operator’s license after the day of the person’s refusal to submit to the test except that the director may not give credit for time in which the person retained driving privileges through a temporary operator’s permit issued under this section or section 39-20-03.2. The period of revocation or denial of issuance of a license or permit under this section is:

One hundred eighty days if the person’s driving record shows that within the seven years preceding the most recent violation of this section, the person’s operator’s license has not previously been suspended, revoked, or issuance denied for a violation of this chapter or section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance.

Two years if the person’s driving record shows that within the seven years preceding the most recent violation of this section, the person’s operator’s license has been once previously suspended, revoked, or issuance denied for a violation of this chapter or section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance.

Three years if the person’s driving record shows that within the seven years preceding the most recent violation of this section, the person’s operator’s license has at least twice previously been suspended, revoked, or issuance denied under this chapter, or for a violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance, or any combination of the same, and the suspensions, revocations, or denials resulted from at least two separate arrests.

A person’s driving privileges are not subject to revocation if all of the following criteria are met:

An administrative hearing is not held under section 39-20-05;

The person mails an affidavit to the director within twenty-five days after the temporary operator’s permit is issued. The affidavit must state that the person:

Intends to voluntarily plead guilty to violating section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance within twenty-five days after the temporary operator’s permit is issued;

Agrees that the person’s driving privileges must be suspended as provided under section 39-06.1-10;

Acknowledges the right to a section 39-20-05 administrative hearing and section 39-20-06 judicial review and voluntarily and knowingly waives these rights; and

Agrees that the person’s driving privileges must be revoked as provided under this section without an administrative hearing or judicial review, if the person does not plead guilty within twenty-five days after the temporary operator’s permit is issued, or the court does not accept the guilty plea, or the guilty plea is withdrawn;

The person pleads guilty to violating section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance within twenty-five days after the temporary operator’s permit is issued;

The court accepts the person’s guilty plea and a notice of that fact is mailed to the director within twenty-five days after the temporary operator’s permit is issued; and

A copy of the final order or judgment of conviction evidencing the acceptance of the person’s guilty plea is received by the director prior to the return or reinstatement of the person’s driving privileges.

The court must mail a copy of an order granting a withdrawal of a guilty plea to violating section 39-08-01, or equivalent ordinance, to the director within ten days after it is ordered. Upon receipt of the order, the director shall immediately revoke the person’s driving privileges as provided under this section without providing an administrative hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 4; 1969, ch. 356, § 2; 1973, ch. 313, § 1; 1983, ch. 415, § 26; 1983, ch. 444, § 3; 1985, ch. 429, § 15; 1987, ch. 460, § 13; 1987, ch. 481, § 3; 1989, ch. 478, § 3; 1989, ch. 479, § 1; 1991, ch. 429, § 1; 1995, ch. 372, § 11; 2003, ch. 321, § 2; 2005, ch. 330, § 6; 2013, ch. 301, § 14; 2015, ch. 268, § 10, effective April 15, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 10 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015 became effective April 15, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 15 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015.

Cross-References.

Arrest without warrant, see § 29-06-15.

Penalties for driving while license suspended or revoked, see §§ 39-06-42, 39-06-43.

39-20-04.1.
Administrative sanction for driving or being in physical control of a vehicle while having certain alcohol concentration.

After the receipt of the certified report of a law enforcement officer and if no written request for hearing has been received from the arrested person under section 39-20-05, or if that hearing is requested and the findings, conclusion, and decision from the hearing confirm that the law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to arrest the person and test results show that the arrested person was driving or in physical control of a vehicle while having an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to a person under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight at the time of the performance of a test within two hours after driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle, the director shall suspend the person’s driving privileges as follows:

For ninety-one days if the person’s driving record shows that, within the seven years preceding the date of the arrest, the person has not previously violated section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance or the person’s operator’s license has not previously been suspended or revoked under this chapter and the violation was for an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to a person under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight, and under eighteen one-hundredths of one percent by weight.

For one hundred eighty days if the operator’s record shows the person has not violated section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance within the seven years preceding the last violation and the last violation was for an alcohol concentration of at least eighteen one-hundredths of one percent by weight.

For three hundred sixty-five days if the person’s driving record shows that, within the seven years preceding the date of the arrest, the person has once previously violated section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance or the person’s operator’s license has once previously been suspended or revoked under this chapter with the last violation or suspension for an alcohol concentration under eighteen one-hundredths of one percent by weight.

For two years if the person’s driving record shows that within the seven years preceding the date of the arrest, the person’s operator’s license has once been suspended, revoked, or issuance denied under this chapter, or for a violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance, with the last violation or suspension for an alcohol concentration of at least eighteen one-hundredths of one percent by weight or if the person’s driving record shows that within the seven years preceding the date of arrest, the person’s operator’s license has at least twice previously been suspended, revoked, or issuance denied under this chapter, or for a violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance, or any combination thereof, and the suspensions, revocations, or denials resulted from at least two separate arrests with the last violation or suspension for an alcohol concentration of under eighteen one-hundredths of one percent by weight.

For three years if the operator’s record shows that within the seven years preceding the date of the arrest, the person’s operator’s license has at least twice previously been suspended, revoked, or issuance denied under this chapter, or for a violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance, or any combination thereof, and the suspensions, revocations, or denials resulted from at least two separate arrests and the last violation or suspension was for an alcohol concentration of at least eighteen one-hundredths of one percent by weight.

In the suspension of the person’s operator’s license the director shall give credit for the time the person was without an operator’s license after the day of the offense, except that the director may not give credit for the time the person retained driving privileges through a temporary operator’s permit issued under section 39-20-03.1 or 39-20-03.2.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 415, § 35; 1985, ch. 429, § 16; 1989, ch. 478, § 4; 1993, ch. 375, § 8; 1993, ch. 387, § 4; 1997, ch. 334, § 5; 2003, ch. 316, § 5; 2003, ch. 321, § 3; 2005, ch. 330, § 7; 2009, ch. 328, § 7; 2013, ch. 301, § 15.

Cross-References.

Prior offenses under § 39-08-01 restricted to those after July 1, 1981, see § 39-08-01.1.